Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Chapter 22. Landscaping and Scenic Enhancement.

Cross references. —

For definitions and penalties applicable to this chapter, see AS

19.59.001

and

19.59.002

.

Sec. 19.22.010.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to promote the safety, convenience, and enjoyment of travel on and protection of the public investment in highways of the state, and to authorize the restoration, preservation, and enhancement of scenic beauty within and adjacent to highways of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 233 SLA 1968)

Sec. 19.22.020.
Authorization to acquire and improve.

The department is authorized to acquire by purchase, exchange, gift, or condemnation land or any interest in land necessary for the restoration, preservation, and enhancement of scenic beauty, within or adjacent to the rights-of-way of highways on the state highway system.

The department may acquire and develop publicly owned and controlled rest and recreation areas and sanitary and other facilities within or adjacent to the highway right-of-way reasonably necessary to accommodate the traveling public.

The department may make improvements necessary to implement the purposes of AS

19.22.010

.

The condemnation authority granted by this chapter may not be exercised beyond 660 feet from the right-of-way of the highway.

History.

(§ 1 ch 233 SLA 1968)

Sec. 19.22.030.
Definitions.

In this chapter, “state highway system” means all highways located in this state which are or hereafter may be officially designated as state highways under the provisions of AS

19.10.020

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 233 SLA 1968; am § 53 ch 30 SLA 1996)